California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The commission, to the extent constitutionally permitted and if it determines that such actions constitute a highway purpose, may allocate funds from the State Highway Account to match on an equal basis the value of any gifts offered and accepted by the department for deposit in the Special Interest Stopping Place Fund and may in such cases, if appropriate, further allocate funds from the State Highway Account for the maintenance of property acquired pursuant to such gifts.

The amount matched for each gift shall be used in conjunction with the gift for the purpose for which the gift was
 accepted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 30.7.)
-------------------------------------------

155.6.

Unless prohibited by federal laws or rules and regulations, the department may authorize the installation of coin-operated binocular or telescopic viewing machines at the vista point on the north end of the Golden Gate Bridge.

Any money received by the state for authorizing the placement of these viewing machines shall be transferred by the department to the State Highway Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 369, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

155.7.

(a) On or before April 1, 2018, the Secretary of Transportation, in consultation with the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, shall establish a Transportation Permitting Task Force consisting of the following members:

(1) The Secretary of Transportation or his or her designee.

(2) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency or his or her designee.

(3) The Chair of the California Transportation Commission or his or her designee.

(4) Representatives from the following:

(A) Department of
 Transportation.

(B) Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(C) The State Water Resources Control Board.

(D) Regional water quality control boards.

(E) The California Coastal Commission.

(F) Other relevant state or public entities.

(b) The taskforce shall develop a structured coordination process for early engagement of all parties in the development of transportation projects to reduce permit processing time, establish reasonable deadlines for permit approvals, and provide for greater certainty of permit approval requirements.

(c) (1) On or
 before December 1, 2019, the Secretary of Transportation shall prepare and submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, a report of findings based on the efforts of the taskforce. The report shall include, but is not limited to, a detailed analysis of the following issues:

(A) The existing permitting process for transportation projects in California, including a discussion of the points in the process where delays are most likely to occur.

(B) The utilization of existing positions in the various state resource agencies currently supported by transportation funds, including an analysis of the benefits of those positions to the state’s transportation programs relative to their costs.

(C) The process developed pursuant to subdivision (b).

(D) Resource levels needed at the resource agencies to implement the process developed pursuant to subdivision (b).

(E) Legislative or regulatory issues, if any, that need to be addressed to implement the process developed pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this subdivision shall be inoperative on December 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 204.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Barriers to Fish Passage [156. - 156.5.]

156.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Fish passage” means the ability of an anadromous fish to access appropriate habitat at all points in its life cycle, including spawning and rearing.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 589, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

156.1.

(a) The Director of Transportation shall prepare an annual report describing the status of the department’s progress in locating, assessing, and remediating barriers to fish passage. This report shall be given to the Legislature by October 31 of each year through the year 2025.

(b) Each report issued after October 31, 2016, shall include a status report on the remediation of barriers to fish passage on projects that have been identified pursuant to Section 156.5. The status report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following information regarding a project identified pursuant to Section 156.5: 

(1) Any updated information received by the department from the Department of Fish and Wildlife regarding the barriers to fish passage on the project.

(2) Whether funding has been committed to the project.

(3) The source of any funding for the project.

(4) The budget summary of the project.

(5) The status of inspections of culverts to ensure they are functioning properly and any other actions by the department to assess or remediate barriers to fish passage on the project.

(6) The applicable program initiation document work plan review.

(7) The estimated completion date for the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 12, Sec. 8.   (AB 95)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

156.2.

The department shall pursue development of a programmatic environmental review process with appropriate state and federal regulatory agencies for remediating barriers to fish passage that will streamline the permitting process for projects. The department shall include a description of its progress on this review process in the report specified in Section 156.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 589, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

156.3.

For any project using state or federal transportation funds programmed after January 1, 2006, the department shall ensure that, if the project affects a stream crossing on a stream where anadromous fish are, or historically were, found, an assessment of potential barriers to fish passage is done prior to commencing project design. The department shall submit the assessment to the Department of Fish and Game and add it to the CALFISH database. If any structural barrier to passage exists, remediation of the problem shall be designed into the project by the implementing agency. New projects shall be constructed so that they do not present a barrier to fish passage. When barriers to fish passage are being addressed, plans and projects shall be developed in consultation with the Department of Fish and Game.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 638.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

156.4.

For any repair or construction project using state or federal transportation funds that affects a stream crossing on a stream where anadromous fish are, or historically were, found, the department shall perform an assessment of the site for potential barriers to fish passage and submit the assessment to the Department of Fish and Game.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 589, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

156.5.

(a) The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall identify projects described in this article that present the most significant barriers to fish passage.

(b) The department shall prioritize and expedite the remediation of barriers to fish passage on projects identified pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) For the 2015–16 fiscal year, the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund to the Department of Transportation for the identification and remediation of high-priority fish passages consistent with this section and Section 156.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 12, Sec. 9.   (AB 95)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.7. Clean Renewable Energy Bonds for the Department of Transportation [157. - 157.8.]

157.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the authority granted to the Department of Transportation under this act is restricted to the specific program for which funds are appropriated in Item 2660-306-0942 of the Budget Act of 2008, and that the amount of State Highway Account funds committed to this program shall be limited to the amount appropriated in Item 2660-306-0942 of the Budget Act of 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 756, Sec. 15.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

157.1.

The department, through the Treasurer and the California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority, may issue Clean Renewable Energy Bonds for purposes of financing the acquisition and installation of solar energy systems, and related appurtenances thereto, at department facilities. For purposes of this article, Clean Renewable Energy Bonds are bonds issued subject to the conditions and terms of Section 1303 of the federal Energy Tax Incentives Act of 2005 (P.L. 109-58; I.R.C. Sec. 54).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 756, Sec. 15.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

157.2.

(a) The net proceeds of bonds issued under this article shall be deposited in the Clean Renewable Energy Bonds Subaccount, which is hereby established as a special trust fund in the Special Deposit Fund created pursuant to Section 16370 of the Government Code.

(b) On or before July 1, 2015, any remaining moneys in the subaccount shall be transferred to the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 12, Sec. 10.   (AB 95)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

157.4.

(a) In conjunction with the issuance of bonds pursuant to Section 157.1, the department may, until January 1, 2014, enter into lease-purchase agreements, lease agreements, or similar agreements with the California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority to secure financial assistance for the acquisition and installation of solar energy systems, and to arrange for the payment of debt service on the Clean Renewable Energy Bonds.

(b) The department may pledge the solar energy system property, or any interest therein, that is acquired or installed pursuant to this article as security for any payment in connection with the acquisition, leasing, or financing of that property or interest, subject to the purposes described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 756, Sec. 15.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

157.6.

The solar energy systems funded pursuant to this article may utilize, and shall comply with, either the net energy metering program allowable under Section 2827 of the Public Utilities Code or the feed-in-tariff program allowable under Section 399.20 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 756, Sec. 15.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

157.8.

On or before March 1 of each fiscal year, and until maturity of the bonds issued pursuant to this article, the department shall report to the budget committees of each house of the Legislature with regard to the issuance of bonds and the acquisition and installation of solar energy systems under this article. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the status of each facility on which the department has installed solar energy systems; an accounting of the costs for each solar energy system installed or acquired by the department; a description of the energy savings the department has achieved by acquiring or installing a solar energy system or systems; and a review and analysis of the expected cost savings at the time of issuance of the bonds versus actual savings annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 756, Sec. 15.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.8. Barriers to Wildlife Movement [158. - 158.5.]

158.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Connectivity area” includes any of the following:

(1) An area identified by any federal or state agency that meets the needs for a special status species pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) or the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code).

(2) An area identified by the Department of Fish and Wildlife as important for ecological connectivity for fish or wildlife between natural landscape areas based on consideration of the following factors:

(A) Important landscape linkages identified in regional connectivity studies or habitat protection plans.

(B) Known ungulate migration routes, including those identified in response to the federal Secretarial Order 3362, issued on February 9, 2018, by the federal Secretary of the Interior, and any subsequent updates to the order.

(C) Important movement corridors for sensitive species according to species-specific studies, genetic studies, or published recovery plans.

(D) Known areas of high wildlife mortality due to transportation infrastructure.

(E) Areas where wildlife is known to cross more frequently than other nearby areas, including riparian corridors, canyon bottoms, ridges, or
 open-space corridors.

(F) Areas where wildlife approach and refuse to cross highways, as identified by wildlife behavior data.

(G) Areas where habitat of adjacent lands is currently in good condition.

(H) Highways with identified barriers where lands adjacent to all approaches to the highway have conservation protections.

(I) Linkages that could facilitate range shifts due to climate change, including areas that connect lower to higher elevations or connect to northern habitats.

(3) An area identified by the department with known or potential transportation barriers to wildlife connectivity, as determined by the department.

(b) “Fish” means fish as defined in Section 45 of the Fish and Game Code.

(c) “Natural landscape area” means a natural, intact habitat area with high ecological integrity that provides core habitat for wildlife and supports native biodiversity.

(d) “Permeability” means the ability of a feature, improvement, or facility to provide for passage of wildlife and improve connectivity to natural landscape areas or other habitat.

(e) “Wildlife” means wildlife as defined in Section 89.5 of the Fish and Game Code.

(f) “Wildlife passage features” means culverts, underpasses, overpasses, bridges, directional fencing, barrier breaks, wildlife monitoring devices or detection systems, elevated highway segments, or other features, supported by a functional
 or potentially functional ecological buffer of habitat on multiple approaches to a highway that encourage use of the feature and are designed to be managed or restored using the best available science to improve the ability of wildlife to safely traverse transportation infrastructure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 964, Sec. 2.   (AB 2344)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

158.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department review the full extent of the state highway system, as currently maintained, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife and with opportunities for the public to provide data input for consideration, to develop a comprehensive approach to address wildlife connectivity needs throughout the state with the goal of implementing measures that protect, conserve, and improve the state’s unique wildlife, landscapes, and natural resources.

(b) In consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife and other appropriate agencies, the department shall establish an inventory of connectivity needs on the state highway system where the implementation of wildlife passage features could
 reduce wildlife-vehicle collisions or enhance wildlife connectivity. In establishing the inventory of connectivity needs, the department, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife and other appropriate agencies, shall consider all of the following factors:

(1) The ability of wildlife passage features to enhance connectivity and permeability within a connectivity area or natural landscape area.

(2) The logistics surrounding implementation of wildlife passage features, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The cost effectiveness of implementing wildlife passage features through associated transportation projects.

(B) The ease or capability of facilitating necessary land acquisitions to provide an ecological buffer.

(C) Public support for associated transportation projects.

(D) The ability of wildlife passage features to facilitate continued functional wildlife movement or improved public safety outcomes into the future.

(3) Whether the implementation of wildlife passage features would do any of the following:

(A) Substantially increase climate-resilient wildlife connectivity.

(B) Substantially decrease the likelihood of collisions between wildlife and vehicles.

(C) Contribute to the survival or recovery of any species or population of a species, including, but not limited to:

(i) Species listed as a threatened species or endangered species pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).

(ii) Species listed as a candidate species, threatened species, or endangered species pursuant to the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code).

(iii) Species at risk from highways and habitat fragmentation.

(4) Any other relevant considerations, as determined by the department.

(c) No later than July 1, 2024, the department shall develop and publish, on its internet website, the inventory and a list of funded transportation projects with wildlife passage features that address wildlife connectivity needs. The
 department shall update the inventory and the project list biennially, at a minimum, and may update the inventory or the list more often, as needed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 964, Sec. 2.   (AB 2344)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

158.2.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), for any project on the state highway system located in a connectivity area beginning the project initiation phase on or after July 1, 2025, that adds a traffic lane or that has the potential to significantly impair wildlife connectivity for target species in the connectivity area based on criteria developed in collaboration with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the department shall perform an assessment, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, before commencing project design and continuing through the development of the project and into implementation, to identify potential wildlife connectivity barriers and any needs for improved permeability.

(2) As
 part of the assessment, the department shall consider factors affecting wildlife connectivity that provide scalable solutions for all defined species needs, as determined by the department, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(3) The assessment may incorporate relevant guidelines and standards in applicable habitat conservation plans approved pursuant to Section 1539 of Title 16 of the United States Code and natural community conservation plans approved pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code.

(4) The department shall submit the assessment to the Department of Fish and Wildlife and, if any structural barrier to wildlife connectivity exists or will be added by the project for target species in the connectivity area based on criteria developed in collaboration with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the
 implementing agency shall remediate barriers to wildlife connectivity in conjunction with the project. A project subject to this requirement may incorporate relevant assessments, guidelines, and standards in applicable habitat conservation plans approved pursuant to Section 1539 of Title 16 of the United States Code and natural community conservation plans approved pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the California Fish and Game Code.

(5) The department shall publish on its internet website a list of all of the transportation projects that require remediation pursuant to paragraph (4) and information regarding whether wildlife passage features are included in those projects or if mitigation credits are applied to the project pursuant to subdivision (c). The department shall update the project list biennially, at a minimum, and may update the list more often, as needed.

(b) The requirements of subdivision (a) shall apply to the following types of projects only where feasible, practicable, and cost effective, as determined by the department:

(1) Emergency projects.

(2) Safety-focused projects that meet the criteria provided by the State Highway System Management Plan, that would reduce fatal and serious injury collisions on the state highway system, that are included in the highway maintenance program or the State Highway Operation and Protection Program, and that do not add a passing lane, turning lane, or auxiliary lane exceeding one mile in length.

(c) The department may use compensatory mitigation credits approved pursuant to Section 1957 of the Fish and Game Code to satisfy the requirements of this section if the
 Department of Fish and Wildlife concurs with the use of those credits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 964, Sec. 2.   (AB 2344)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

158.3.

On or before July 1, 2025, the department shall update appropriate design guidance, including the Highway Design Manual, to incorporate design concepts for wildlife passage features and related standard plans and specifications as appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 964, Sec. 2.   (AB 2344)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

158.4.

(a) The Transportation Wildlife Connectivity Remediation Program is hereby established to be administered by the department, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the purposes of improving wildlife connectivity across transportation systems in connectivity areas.

(b) Upon appropriation of funds by the Legislature, the department shall develop a program of projects that support the remediation and improvement of wildlife connectivity across transportation systems, including the state highway system, in accordance with this section.

(c) (1) The department, in concurrence with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, shall develop guidelines
 for the implementation of the program, following one or more public workshops and an opportunity for the public to provide written comments. The guidelines for the program are exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) The guidelines for the program shall establish selection criteria including the factors set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 158.1 with consideration given to funding wildlife connectivity improvements as standalone projects or funding those improvements on the department’s planned projects, including, but not limited to, maintenance and operations projects, to achieve efficiencies in addressing wildlife connectivity needs identified pursuant to subdivision (d).

(d) A project funded by the program shall address a wildlife connectivity need identified in
 the inventory of connectivity needs for the state highway system established pursuant to Section 158.1 or another documented wildlife connectivity need across transportation infrastructure in a connectivity area.

(e) A project funded by this program may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) The placement of exclusion and directional fencing.

(2) The use of advanced technology to improve the safety of wildlife crossing transportation infrastructure.

(3) The construction of wildlife-friendly underpasses, overpasses, culverts, and elevated sections of road in key wildlife connectivity areas.

(f) The department may receive compensatory mitigation credits pursuant to Section
 1957 of the Fish and Game Code for the implementation of a project in this program if the Department of Fish and Wildlife concurs with the creation of those credits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 964, Sec. 2.   (AB 2344)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

158.5.

(a) The department shall submit a report to the relevant policy committees and the budget committees of the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on or before July 1, 2028, on the implementation of this article. The report shall include recommendations for this article and describe the status of the department’s progress in doing all of the following:

(1) Developing an inventory of wildlife connectivity needs on the state highway system pursuant to Section 158.1.

(2) Assessing transportation projects in connectivity areas for wildlife connectivity impacts pursuant to Section 158.2.

(3) Implementing wildlife connectivity improvements on transportation projects pursuant to Section 158.2.

(4) Updating appropriate design guidance, including the Highway Design Manual, to incorporate design concepts for wildlife passage features and related standard plans and specifications pursuant to Section 158.3.

(5) Implementing the Transportation Wildlife Connectivity Remediation Program pursuant to Section 158.4.

(6) Funding wildlife connectivity improvements, including total funding amount by fund source for these improvements and a list of improvements that have been funded since the enactment of this article.

(b) The report shall also include information regarding both of the following:

(1) A description of the consultation and concurrence process between the department, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, and other appropriate entities.

(2) Significant accomplishments or obstacles to meeting the objectives of the article.

(c) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2032, and, as of January 1, 2033, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 964, Sec. 2.   (AB 2344)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Inoperative July 1, 2032, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Highway Standards [160. - 162.5.]

160.

The width of the right-of-way for all state highways shall be at least 40 feet.

The department may maintain any state highway having a lesser width of right-of-way, but shall not expend any money thereon for major construction or improvement until the width of the right-of-way is at least 40 feet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

161.

On construction projects, the department shall install on the surface of state highways upon which the operation of bicycles is permitted only those types of grates which are not hazardous to bicycle riders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

162.

(a) Unless the commission finds that it would be impractical, any state highway exclusive and preferential lane for buses and other high occupancy vehicles constructed on new alignment or new structures shall be designed and constructed on horizontal and vertical alignments, including the grade, curvature, and horizontal and vertical clearances, so that the lane may readily be reconstructed as an exclusive public mass transit guideway, using the department’s rail transit design criteria.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), prior to designing a state highway in conformance with this section, the department shall consider all of the following: 

(1) Cost effectiveness.

(2) Any added environmental impact.

(3) The likelihood of a guideway project ever being developed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

162.5.

(a) The department shall develop revised seismic standards for earthquake resistance to be utilized in the design and construction of new state highways and bridges, and for the retrofit of existing highways and bridges.

(b) In the development of those standards, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Thoroughly investigate and analyze the structural damage to highways and bridges resulting from the October 17, 1989, Loma Prieta earthquake, and utilize the experience of that earthquake in the development of revised standards.

(2) Incorporate in those standards, state of the art technology for designing and constructing highways and bridges to withstand extreme seismic activity, utilizing, where appropriate, the available technology and methodology from all engineering and scientific disciplines, including state of the art assessment tools and computer modeling techniques. Where appropriate, the department shall study and incorporate technologies utilized in other countries and proven technologies and accomplishments from other fields, such as those used in the design and construction of high-rise structures.

(3) Maintain contact and communication, and exchange information with, persons and organizations concerned with seismic engineering issues.

(c) The department shall continue to revise and update the standards periodically, so that they reflect the department’s latest findings.

(d) Upon completing the development of revised seismic standards, and whenever those standards are updated, the department shall make the standards, including the supporting data, available to all other public agencies in this state which are engaged in the design, construction, or inspection of streets, roads, highways, and bridges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 18, Sec. 3.   Effective November 7, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.3. Transportation Funding Plan [163. - 164.56.]

163.

The Legislature, through the enactment of this section, intends to establish a policy for the use of all transportation funds that are available to the state, including the State Highway Account, the Public Transportation Account, and federal funds. For the purposes of this section, “federal funds” means any obligational authority to be provided under annual federal transportation appropriations acts. The department and the commission shall prepare fund estimates pursuant to Sections 14524 and 14525 of the Government Code based on the following:

(a) Annual expenditures for the administration of the department shall be the same as the most recent Budget Act, adjusted for inflation.

(b) Annual expenditures for the maintenance and operation of the state highway system shall be the same as the most recent Budget Act, adjusted for inflation and inventory, or, when a maintenance plan has been enacted pursuant to Section 164.6, maintenance expenditures shall be based on planned expenditures in that plan.

(c) Annual expenditure for the rehabilitation of the state highway system shall be the same as the most recent Budget Act, or, when a long-range rehabilitation plan has been enacted pursuant to Section 164.6, shall be based on planned expenditures in that long-range plan.

(d) Annual expenditures for local assistance shall be the amount required to fund local assistance programs required by state or federal law or regulations, including, but not limited to, railroad grade crossing maintenance, bicycle transportation account, congestion mitigation and air quality, regional surface transportation programs, local highway bridge replacement and rehabilitation, local seismic retrofit, local hazard elimination and safety, and local emergency relief.

(e) After deducting expenditures for administration, operation, maintenance, local assistance, safety, and rehabilitation pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d), and for expenditures pursuant to Section 164.56, the remaining funds shall be available for capital improvement projects to be programmed in the state transportation improvement program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 212, Sec. 5.   Effective August 11, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

164.

(a) Funds made available for transportation capital improvement projects under subdivision (e) of Section 163 shall be programmed and expended for the following program categories:

(1) Twenty-five percent for interregional improvements.

(2) Seventy-five percent for regional improvements.

(b) Sixty percent of the funds available for interregional improvements under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be programmed and expended for improvements to state highways that are specified in Sections 164.10 to 164.20, inclusive, and that are outside the boundaries of an urbanized area with a population of more than 50,000, and for intercity rail improvements.

(c) Not less than 15 percent of the amount of funds programmed under subdivision (b) shall be programmed for intercity rail improvement projects, including separation of grade projects.

(d) Funds made available under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be used for transportation improvement projects that are needed to facilitate interregional movement of people and goods. The projects may include state highway, intercity passenger rail, mass transit guideway, or grade separation projects.

(e) Funds made available under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be used for transportation improvement projects that are needed to improve transportation within the region. The projects may include, but shall not be limited to, improving state highways, local roads, public transit, intercity rail, pedestrian, and bicycle facilities, and grade separation, transportation system management, transportation demand management, soundwall projects, intermodal facilities, safety, and providing funds to match federal funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 596, Sec. 5.   Effective September 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

164.1.

(a) Federal funds derived from apportionments made to the state under Section 1101(a)(11) of the federal Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transportation Equity Act: A Legacy for Users (SAFETEA-LU; P.L. 109-59) for the coordinated border infrastructure program established under Section 1303 of that act shall be included and separately identified in the fund estimates prepared pursuant to Sections 14524 and 14525 of the Government Code, the interregional transportation improvement program submitted by the department pursuant to Section 14526 of the Government Code, and the state transportation improvement program adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 14529 of the Government Code. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), these funds shall be programmed, allocated, and expended in the same manner as other federal funds made available for capital improvement projects in the state transportation improvement program.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(1) The programming, allocation, and expenditure of the funds described in subdivision (a) may be for any purpose authorized under federal law, including projects in Mexico.

(2) The funds described in subdivision (a) shall not be subject to the distribution formulas and limitations described in Section 164.

(3) The nonfederal match for the funds described in subdivision (a) may be programmed from any available local source, or any available state transportation funding source, including other state transportation improvement program funding, if the regional transportation planning agency concurs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 451, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

164.3.

The interregional road system shall include, and shall be limited to, those routes that are specified in Sections 164.10 to 164.20, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 622, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

164.6.

(a) (1) The department shall prepare a State Highway System Management Plan. The plan shall include a 10-year state highway system rehabilitation plan for the rehabilitation or reconstruction, or the combination thereof, by the State Highway Operation and Protection Program, of all state highways and bridges owned by the state. The plan shall identify all rehabilitation needs for the 10-year period beginning on July 1, 1998, and ending on June 30, 2008, and shall include a schedule of improvements to complete all needed rehabilitation during the life of the plan not later than June 30, 2008. The plan shall be updated every two years beginning in 2000.

(2) The State Highway System Management Plan shall also include a five-year maintenance plan that addresses the maintenance needs of the state highway system. The maintenance plan shall be updated every two years, concurrent with the rehabilitation plan described in paragraph (1). The maintenance plan shall include only maintenance activities that, if the activities are not performed, could result in increased State Highway Operation and Protection Program costs in the future. The maintenance plan shall identify any existing backlog in those maintenance activities and shall recommend a strategy, specific activities, and an associated funding level to reduce or prevent any backlog during the plan five-year period.

(b) (1) The State Highway System Management Plan shall include specific quantifiable accomplishments,
 goals, objectives, costs, and performance measures, including for complete streets facilities, including pedestrian and bicycle facilities, consistent with the asset management plan required by Section 14526.4 of the Government Code. The plan shall contain strategies to control costs and improve efficiency of the State Highway Operation and Protection Program.

(2) In 2027, as feasible, and continuing thereafter, the State Highway System Management Plan shall
 include specific quantifiable accomplishments, goals, objectives, costs, and performance measures for transit priority facilities, consistent with the asset management plan required by Section 14526.4 of the Government Code and the department’s transit policy and associated guidance.

(c) The State Highway System Management Plan for rehabilitation and maintenance shall attempt to balance resources between State Highway Operation and Protection Program activities and maintenance activities in order to achieve identified goals at the lowest possible long-term total cost. If the maintenance plan recommends increases in maintenance spending, it shall identify projected future State Highway Operation and Protection Program costs that would be avoided by increasing maintenance spending. The department’s maintenance division
 shall identify highway maintenance projects and associated costs that allow it to achieve the requirements of this subdivision.
